www/common/latex/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-sh-latn.hyp.txt
na-dno
na-tka
na-tka-ti
na-tka-še
o-dno
o-tka
o-tka-ti
o-tka-še
po-dno
po-dne
po-tki
po-tku
po-tka
po-tke
u-dno
i-gde
i-gdje
svu-gde
sve-gde
svu-gdje
sve-gdje
po-ne-gde
po-ne-gdje
i-zbi
i-zba
i-zbe
i-zbi-ci
i-zbi-ca
i-zbi-ce
i-zvit
i-zim
izo-ba-ri
izo-ba-ru
izo-ba-ra
izo-ba-re
i-skok
i-sko-ku
i-sko-ka
i-skon
i-sko-ni
i-sko-nu
i-sko-na
i-skri
i-skru
i-skra
i-skre
i-skrav
i-spod
i-spo-da
i-stri
i-stro
i-stru
i-stra
i-stre
na-ji
na-jo
na-ju
na-ja
na-je
na-jam
na-jest
o-braz
o-bret
o-dvi-ka
o-dran
o-dra-ti
pre-dvoj
ra-zmi
ra-zmo
ra-zmu
ra-zma
ra-zme
ra-zni
ra-zno
ra-znu
ra-zna
ra-zne
ra-sklop
ra-spe-lo
ra-spe-lu
ra-spe-la
ra-spe-ću
ra-spe-ća
ra-spe-će
ra-sti
ra-stu
ra-sta
ra-ste
ra-stom
ra-ster
ra-šći
ra-šćo
ra-šću
ra-šća
ra-šće
u-zni
u-zno
u-zna
u-znik
u-zrok
u-ski
u-sko
u-sku
u-ska
u-ske
us-kos
u-spio
u-speo
u-spor
u-šću
u-šća
u-šće
in-te-res
tran-su
tran-sa
tran-som
